Vermont, session 2025-2026, S126.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Purpose of the Act; Goals * * *
Sec. 1. PURPOSE; GOALS
The purpose of this act is to achieve transformation of and structural
changes to Vermont’s health care system. In enacting this legislation, the
General Assembly intends to advance the following goals:
(1) improvements in health outcomes, population health, quality of care,
regional access to services, and reducing disparities in access resulting from
demographic factors or health status;
(2) an integrated system of care, with robust care coordination and
increased investments in primary care, home health care, and long-term care;
(3) stabilizing health care providers, controlling the costs of commercial
health insurance, and managing hospital costs based on the total cost of care,
beginning with reference-based pricing and continuing on to global hospital
budgets;
(4) evaluating progress in achieving system transformation and
structural changes by creating and applying standardized accountability
metrics; and
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 2 of 43
2025
(5) establishing a health care system that will attract and retain high-
quality health care professionals to practice in Vermont and that supports,
develops, and preserves the dignity of Vermont’s health care workforce.
* * * Hospital Budgets and Payment Reform * * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9375 is amended to read:
§ 9375. DUTIES
(a) The Board shall execute its duties consistent with the principles
expressed in section 9371 of this title.
(b) The Board shall have the following duties:
(1) Oversee the development and implementation, and evaluate the
effectiveness, of health care payment and delivery system reforms designed to
control the rate of growth in health care costs; promote seamless care,
administration, and service delivery; and maintain health care quality in
Vermont, including ensuring that the payment reform pilot projects set forth in
this chapter are consistent with such reforms.
(A) Implement by rule, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
methodologies for achieving payment reform and containing costs that may
include the participation of Medicare and Medicaid, which may include the
creation of health care professional cost-containment targets, reference-based
pricing, global payments, bundled payments, global budgets, risk-adjusted
capitated payments, or other uniform payment methods and amounts for
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 3 of 43
2025
integrated delivery systems, health care professionals, or other provider
arrangements.
* * *
(5) Set rates for health care professionals pursuant to section 9376 of
this title, to be implemented over time beginning with reference-based pricing
as soon as practicable, but not later than hospital fiscal year 2027, and make
adjustments to the rules on reimbursement methodologies as needed.
(6) Approve, modify, or disapprove requests for health insurance rates
pursuant to 8 V.S.A. § 4062, taking into consideration the requirements in the
underlying statutes,; changes in health care delivery,; changes in payment
methods and amounts, including implementation of reference-based pricing;
protecting insurer solvency,; and other issues at the discretion of the Board.
(7) Review and establish hospital budgets pursuant to chapter 221,
subchapter 7 of this title, including establishing standards for global hospital
budgets that reflect the implementation of reference-based pricing and the total
cost of care targets determined in collaboration with federal partners and other
stakeholders or as set by the Statewide Health Care Delivery Plan developed
pursuant to section 9403 of this title, once established. Beginning not later
than hospital fiscal year 2028, to the extent that resources are available, the
Board shall establish global hospital budgets for one or more Vermont
hospitals that are not critical access hospitals. By hospital fiscal year 2030, to
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 4 of 43
2025
the extent that resources are available, the Board shall establish global hospital
budgets for all Vermont hospitals.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 9376 is amended to read:
§ 9376. PAYMENT AMOUNTS; METHODS
(a) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure payments to
health care professionals that are consistent with efficiency, economy, and
quality of care and will permit them to provide, on a solvent basis, effective
and efficient health services that are in the public interest. It is also the intent
of the General Assembly to eliminate the shift of costs between the payers of
health services to ensure that the amount paid to health care professionals is
sufficient to enlist enough providers to ensure that health services are available
to all Vermonters and are distributed equitably.
(b) Rate-setting.
(1) The Board shall set reasonable rates for health care professionals,
health care provider bargaining groups created pursuant to section 9409 of this
title, manufacturers of prescribed products, medical supply companies, and
other companies providing health services or health supplies based on
methodologies pursuant to section 9375 of this title, in order to have a
consistent reimbursement amount accepted by these persons. In its discretion,
the Board may implement rate-setting for different groups of health care
professionals over time and need not set rates for all types of health care
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 5 of 43
2025
professionals. In establishing rates, the Board may consider legitimate
differences in costs among health care professionals, such as the cost of
providing a specific necessary service or services that may not be available
elsewhere in the State, and the need for health care professionals in particular
areas of the State, particularly in underserved geographic or practice shortage
areas.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to:
(A) limit the ability of a health care professional to accept less than
the rate established in subdivision (1) of this subsection (b) from a patient
without health insurance or other coverage for the service or services received;
or
(B) reduce or limit the covered services offered by Medicare or
Medicaid.
(c) Methodologies. The Board shall approve payment methodologies that
encourage cost-containment; provision of high-quality, evidence-based health
services in an integrated setting; patient self-management; access to primary
care health services for underserved individuals, populations, and areas; and
healthy lifestyles. Such methodologies shall be consistent with payment
reform and with evidence-based practices, and may include fee-for-service
payments if the Board determines such payments to be appropriate.
(d) Supervision. To the extent required to avoid federal antitrust violations
and in furtherance of the policy identified in subsection (a) of this section, the
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 6 of 43
2025
Board shall facilitate and supervise the participation of health care
professionals and health care provider bargaining groups in the process
described in subsection (b) of this section.
(e) Reference-based pricing.
(1)(A) The Board shall establish reference-based prices that represent
the maximum amounts that hospitals shall accept as payment in full for items
provided and services delivered in Vermont. The Board may also implement
reference-based pricing for services delivered outside a hospital by setting the
minimum amounts that shall be paid for items provided and services delivered
by nonhospital-based health care professionals. The Board shall consult with
health insurers, hospitals, other health care professionals as applicable, the
Office of the Health Care Advocate, and the Agency of Human Services in
developing reference-based prices pursuant to this subsection (e), including on
ways to achieve all-payer alignment on the design and implementation of
reference-based pricing.
(B) The Board shall implement reference-based pricing in a manner
that does not allow health care professionals to charge or collect from patients
or health insurers any amount in excess of the reference-based amount
established by the Board.
(2)(A) Reference-based prices established pursuant to this subsection (e)
shall be based on a percentage of the Medicare reimbursement for the same or
a similar item or service or on another benchmark, as appropriate, provided
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 7 of 43
2025
that if the Board establishes prices that are referenced to Medicare, the Board
may opt to update the prices in the future based on a reasonable rate of growth
that is separate from Medicare rates, such as the Medicare Economic Index
measure of inflation, in order to provide predictability and consistency for
health care professionals and payers and to protect against federal funding
pressures that may impact Medicare rates in an unpredictable manner. The
Board may also reference to, and update based on, other payment or pricing
systems where appropriate.
(B) In establishing reference-based prices for a hospital pursuant to
this subsection (e), the Board shall consider the composition of the
communities served by the hospital, including the health of the population,
demographic characteristics, acuity, payer mix, labor costs, social risk factors,
and other factors that may affect the costs of providing care in the hospital
service area, as well as the hospital’s role in Vermont’s health care system.
(3)(A) The Board shall begin implementing reference-based pricing as
soon as practicable but not later than hospital fiscal year 2027 by establishing
the maximum amounts that Vermont hospitals shall accept as payment in full
for items provided and services delivered. After initial implementation, the
Board shall review the reference-based prices for each hospital annually as part
of the hospital budget review process set forth in chapter 221, subchapter 7 of
this title.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 8 of 43
2025
(B) The Board, in collaboration with the Department of Financial
Regulation, shall monitor the implementation of reference-based pricing to
ensure that any decreases in amounts paid to hospitals also result in decreases
in health insurance premiums. The Board shall post its findings regarding the
alignment between price decreases and premium decreases annually on its
website.
(4) The Board shall identify factors that would necessitate terminating
or modifying the use of reference-based pricing in one or more hospitals, such
as a measurable reduction in access to or quality of care.
(5) The Green Mountain Care Board, in consultation with the Agency of
Human Services and the Vermont Steering Committee for Comprehensive
Primary Health Care established pursuant to section 9403b of this title, may
implement reference-based pricing for services delivered outside a hospital,
such as primary care services, and may increase or decrease the percentage of
Medicare or another benchmark as appropriate, first to enhance access to
primary care and later for alignment with the Statewide Health Care Delivery
Strategic Plan established pursuant to section 9403 of this title, once
established. The Board may consider establishing reference-based pricing for
services delivered outside a hospital by setting minimum amounts that shall be
paid for the purpose of prioritizing access to high-quality health care services
in settings that are appropriate to patients’ needs in order to contain costs and
improve patient outcomes.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 9 of 43
2025
(6) The Board’s authority to establish reference-based prices pursuant to
this subsection shall not include the authority to set amounts applicable to
items provided or services delivered to patients who are enrolled in Medicare
or Medicaid.
Sec. 3a. 18 V.S.A. § 9451 is amended to read:
§ 9451. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Hospital” means a hospital licensed under chapter 43 of this title,
except a hospital that is conducted, maintained, or operated by the State of
Vermont.
(2) “Hospital network” means a system comprising two or more
affiliated hospitals, and may include other health care professionals and
facilities, that derives 50 percent or more of its operating revenue, at the
consolidated network level, from Vermont hospitals and in which the affiliated
hospitals deliver health care services in a coordinated manner using an
integrated financial and governance structure.
(3) “Volume” means the number of inpatient days of care or admissions
and the number of all inpatient and outpatient ancillary services rendered to
patients by a hospital.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 10 of 43
2025
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 9454 is amended to read:
§ 9454. HOSPITALS; DUTIES
* * *
(b) Hospitals shall submit information as directed by the Board in order to
maximize hospital budget data standardization and allow the Board to make
direct comparisons of hospital expenses across the health care system.
(c) Hospitals shall adopt a fiscal year that shall begin on October 1.
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 9456 is amended to read:
§ 9456. BUDGET REVIEW
(a) The Board shall conduct reviews of each hospital’s proposed budget
based on the information provided pursuant to this subchapter and in
accordance with a schedule established by the Board.
(b) In conjunction with budget reviews, the Board shall:
(1) review utilization information;
(2) consider the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan
developed pursuant to section 9403 of this title, once established, including the
total cost of care targets, and consult with the Agency of Human Services to
ensure compliance with federal requirements regarding Medicare and
Medicaid;
(3) consider the Health Resource Allocation Plan identifying Vermont’s
critical health needs, goods, services, and resources developed pursuant to
section 9405 of this title;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 11 of 43
2025
(3)(4) consider the expenditure analysis for the previous year and the
proposed expenditure analysis for the year under review;
(4)(5) consider any reports from professional review organizations;
(6) for a hospital that operates within a hospital network, review the
hospital network’s financial operations as they relate to the budget of the
individual hospital;
(5)(7) solicit public comment on all aspects of hospital costs and use and
on the budgets proposed by individual hospitals;
(6)(8) meet with hospitals to review and discuss hospital budgets for the
forthcoming fiscal year;
(7)(9) give public notice of the meetings with hospitals, and invite the
public to attend and to comment on the proposed budgets;
(8)(10) consider the extent to which costs incurred by the hospital in
connection with services provided to Medicaid beneficiaries are being charged
to non-Medicaid health benefit plans and other non-Medicaid payers;
(9)(11) require each hospital to file an analysis that reflects a reduction
in net revenue needs from non-Medicaid payers equal to any anticipated
increase in Medicaid, Medicare, or another public health care program
reimbursements, and to any reduction in bad debt or charity care due to an
increase in the number of insured individuals;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 12 of 43
2025
(10)(12) require each hospital to provide information on administrative
costs, as defined by the Board, including specific information on the amounts
spent on marketing and advertising costs;
(11)(13) require each hospital to create or maintain connectivity to the
State’s Health Information Exchange Network in accordance with the criteria
established by the Vermont Information Technology Leaders, Inc., pursuant to
subsection 9352(i) of this title, provided that the Board shall not require a
hospital to create a level of connectivity that the State’s Exchange is unable to
support;
(12)(14) review the hospital’s investments in workforce development
initiatives, including nursing workforce pipeline collaborations with nursing
schools and compensation and other support for nurse preceptors; and
(13)(15) consider the salaries for the hospital’s executive and clinical
leadership, including variable payments and incentive plans, and the hospital’s
salary spread, including a comparison of median salaries to the medians of
northern New England states and a comparison of the base salaries and total
compensation for the hospital’s executive and clinical leadership with those of
the hospital’s lowest-paid employees who deliver health care services directly
to hospital patients; and
(16) consider the number of employees of the hospital whose duties are
primarily administrative in nature, as defined by the Board, compared with the
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 13 of 43
2025
number of employees whose duties primarily involve delivering health care
services directly to hospital patients.
(c) Individual hospital budgets established under this section shall:
(1) be consistent, to the extent practicable, with the Statewide Health
Care Delivery Strategic Plan, once established, including the total cost of care
targets, and with the Health Resource Allocation Plan;
(2) reflect the reference-based prices established by the Board pursuant
to section 9376 of this title;
(3) take into consideration national, regional, or in-state peer group
norms, according to indicators, ratios, and statistics established by the Board;
(3)(4) promote efficient and economic operation of the hospital and, if a
hospital is affiliated with a hospital network, ensure that hospital spending on
the hospital network’s operations is consistent with the principles for health
care reform expressed in section 9371 of this title and with the Statewide
Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan, once established;
(4)(5) reflect budget performances for prior years;
(5)(6) include a finding that the analysis provided in subdivision (b)(9)
(b)(11) of this section is a reasonable methodology for reflecting a reduction in
net revenues for non-Medicaid payers; and
(6)(7) demonstrate that they support equal access to appropriate mental
health care that meets standards of quality, access, and affordability equivalent
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 14 of 43
2025
to other components of health care as part of an integrated, holistic system of
care; and
(8) include meaningful variable payments and incentive plans for
hospitals that are consistent with this section and with the principles for health
care reform expressed in section 9371 of this title.
(d)(1)(A) Annually, the Board shall establish a budget for each hospital on
or before September 15, followed by a written decision by October 1. Each
hospital shall operate within the budget established under this section.
(B)(i) Beginning not later than hospital fiscal year 2028, to the extent
that resources are available, the Board shall establish global hospital budgets
for one or more Vermont hospitals that are not critical access hospitals. Not
later than hospital fiscal year 2030, to the extent that resources are available,
the Board shall establish global hospital budgets for all Vermont hospitals.
(ii) Global hospital budgets established pursuant to this section
shall include Medicare to the extent permitted under federal law but shall not
include Medicaid.
* * *
(e)(1) The Board, in consultation with the Vermont Program for Quality in
Health Care, shall utilize mechanisms to measure hospital costs, quality, and
access and alignment with the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan,
once established.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 15 of 43
2025
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (D) of this subdivision (e)(2), a
hospital that proposes to reduce or eliminate any service in order to comply
with a budget established under this section shall provide a notice of intent to
the Board, the Agency of Human Services, the Office of the Health Care
Advocate, and the members of the General Assembly who represent the
hospital service area not less than 45 days prior to the proposed reduction or
elimination.
(B) The notice shall explain the rationale for the proposed reduction
or elimination and describe how it is consistent with the Statewide Health Care
Delivery Strategic Plan, once established, and the hospital’s most recent
community health needs assessment conducted pursuant to section 9405a of
this title and 26 U.S.C. § 501(r)(3).
(C) The Board may evaluate the proposed reduction or elimination
for consistency with the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan, once
established and the community health needs assessment, and may modify the
hospital’s budget or take such additional actions as the Board deems
appropriate to preserve access to necessary services.
(D) A service that has been identified for reduction or elimination in
connection with the transformation efforts undertaken by the Board and the
Agency of Human Services pursuant to 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 167 does
not need to comply with subdivisions (A)–(C) of this subdivision (e)(2).
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 16 of 43
2025
(3) The Board, in collaboration with the Department of Financial
Regulation, shall monitor the implementation of any authorized decrease in
hospital services to determine its benefits to Vermonters or to Vermont’s
health care system, or both.
(4) The Board may establish a process to define, on an annual basis,
criteria for hospitals to meet, such as utilization and inflation benchmarks.
(5) The Board may waive one or more of the review processes listed in
subsection (b) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 9458 is added to read:
§ 9458. HOSPITAL NETWORKS; STRUCTURE; FINANCIAL
OPERATIONS
(a) The Board may review and evaluate the structure of a hospital network
to determine:
(1) whether any network operations should be organized and operated
out of a hospital instead of at the network; and
(2) whether the existence and operation of a network provides value to
Vermonters, is in the public interest, and is consistent with the principles for
health care reform expressed in section 9371 of this title and with the
Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan, once established.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 17 of 43
2025
(b) In order to protect the public interest, the Board may, on its own
initiative, investigate the financial operations of a hospital network, including
compensation of the network’s employees and executive leadership.
(c) The Board may recommend any action it deems necessary to correct
any aspect of the structure of a hospital network or its financial operations that
are inconsistent with the principles for health care reform expressed in section
9371 of this title or with the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan,
once established.
* * * Health Care Contracts * * *
Sec. 7. 18 V.S.A. § 9418c is amended to read:
§ 9418c. FAIR CONTRACT STANDARDS
* * *
(e)(1) The requirements of subdivision (b)(5) of this section do not prohibit
a contracting entity from requiring a reasonable confidentiality agreement
between the provider and the contracting entity regarding the terms of the
proposed health care contract.
(2) Upon request, a contracting entity or provider shall provide an
unredacted copy of an executed or proposed health care contract to the
Department of Financial Regulation or the Green Mountain Care Board, or
both.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 18 of 43
2025
* * * Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan; Health Care Delivery
Advisory Committee; Vermont Steering Committee for Comprehensive
Primary Health Care * * *
Sec. 8. 18 V.S.A. § 9403 is added to read:
§ 9403. STATEWIDE HEALTH CARE DELIVERY STRATEGIC PLAN
(a) The Agency of Human Services, in collaboration with the Green
Mountain Care Board, the Department of Financial Regulation, the Vermont
Program for Quality in Health Care, the Office of the Health Care Advocate,
the Health Care Delivery Advisory Committee established in section 9403a of
this title, the Vermont Steering Committee for Comprehensive Primary Health
Care established pursuant to section 9403b of this title, and other interested
stakeholders, shall lead development of an integrated Statewide Health Care
Delivery Strategic Plan as set forth in this section.
(b) The Plan shall:
(1) Align with the principles for health care reform expressed in section
9371 of this title.
(2) Identify existing services and promote universal access across
Vermont to high-quality, cost-effective acute care; primary care, including
primary mental health services; chronic care; long-term care; substance use
disorder treatment services; emergency medical services; nonemergency
medical services; nonmedical services and supports; and hospital-based,
independent, and community-based services.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 19 of 43
2025
(3) Define a shared vision and shared goals and objectives for improving
access to and the quality, efficiency, and affordability of health care services in
Vermont and for reducing disparities in access resulting from demographic
factors or health status, including benchmarks for evaluating progress.
(4) Identify the resources, infrastructure, and support needed to achieve
established targets, which will ensure the feasibility and sustainability of
implementation.
(5) Provide a phased implementation timeline with milestones and
regular reporting to ensure adaptability as needs evolve.
(6) Promote accountability and continuous quality improvement across
Vermont’s health care system through the use of data, scientifically grounded
methods, and high-quality performance metrics to evaluate effectiveness and
inform decision making.
(7) Provide annual targets for the total cost of care across Vermont’s
health care system. Using these total cost of care targets, the Plan shall
identify appropriate allocations of health care resources and services across the
State that balance quality, access, and cost containment. The Plan shall also
establish targets for the percentages of overall health care spending that should
reflect spending on primary care services, including mental health services,
and on preventive care services, which targets shall be aligned with the total
cost of care targets.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 20 of 43
2025
(8) Build on data and information from:
(A) the transformation planning resulting from 2022 Acts and
Resolves No. 167, Secs. 1 and 2;
(B) the expenditure analysis and health care spending estimate
developed pursuant to section 9383 of this title;
(C) the State Health Improvement Plan adopted pursuant to
subsection 9405(a) of this title;
(D) the Health Resource Allocation Plan published by the Green
Mountain Care Board in accordance with subsection 9405(b) of this title;
(E) hospitals’ community health needs assessments and strategic
planning conducted in accordance with section 9405a of this title;
(F) hospital and ambulatory surgical center quality information
published by the Department of Health pursuant to section 9405b of this title;
(G) the statewide quality assurance program maintained by the
Vermont Program for Quality in Health Care pursuant to section 9416 of this
title;
(H) the 2020 report determining the proportion of health care
spending in Vermont that is allocated to primary care, submitted to the General
Assembly by the Green Mountain Care Board and the Department of Vermont
Health Access in accordance with 2019 Acts and Resolves No. 17, Sec. 2;
(I) the 2024 report on Blueprint for Health payments to patient-
centered medical homes, submitted to the General Assembly by the Agency of
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 21 of 43
2025
Human Services in accordance with 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 51, Sec. 5;
and
(J) such additional sources of data and information as the Agency and
other stakeholders deem appropriate.
(9) Identify:
(A) opportunities to improve the quality of care across the health care
delivery system, including exemplars of high-quality care to stimulate best
practice dissemination;
(B) gaps in access to care, as well as unnecessary duplication of
services, including circumstances in which service closures or consolidations
may result in improvements in quality, access, and affordability;
(C) opportunities to reduce administrative burdens;
(D) federal, State, and other barriers to achieving the Plan’s goals
and, to the extent feasible, how those barriers can be removed or mitigated;
(E) priorities in steps for achieving the goals of the Plan;
(F) barriers to access to appropriate mental health and substance use
disorder services that meet standards of quality, access, and affordability
equivalent to other components of health care;
(G) opportunities to integrate health care services for individuals in
the custody of the Department of Corrections as part of Vermont’s health care
delivery system;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 22 of 43
2025
(H) enhancements in quality reporting and data collection to provide
a more current and accurate picture of the quality of health care delivery across
Vermont; and
(I) systems to ensure that reported data is shared with and is
accessible to the health care professionals who are providing care, enabling
them to track performance and inform improvement.
(c) State agencies shall cooperate with all reasonable requests from the
Agency of Human Services for data and other information and assistance
needed for the Agency to prepare and update the Plan pursuant to this section.
(d)(1) In 2025 and 2026, the Agency of Human Services shall engage with
stakeholders; collect and analyze data; gather information obtained through the
processes established in 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 167, Secs. 1 and 2; and
solicit input from the public.
(2) In 2027, the Agency shall prepare the Plan.
(3) On or before January 15, 2028, the Agency shall provide the Plan to
the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare.
(4) The Agency shall prepare an updated Plan every three years and
shall provide it to the General Assembly on or before December 1 of every
third year, beginning on December 1, 2030.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 23 of 43
2025
Sec. 9. 18 V.S.A. § 9403a is added to read:
§ 9403a. HEALTH CARE DELIVERY ADVISORY COMMITTEE
(a) There is created the Health Care Delivery Advisory Committee to:
(1) establish health care affordability benchmarks;
(2) evaluate and monitor the performance of Vermont’s health care
system and its impacts on population health outcomes;
(3) collaborate with the Agency of Human Services and other interested
stakeholders in the development and maintenance of the Statewide Health Care
Delivery Strategic Plan developed pursuant to section 9403 of this title;
(4) consider the recommendations of the Vermont Steering Committee
for Comprehensive Primary Health Care established pursuant to section 9403b
of this title;
(5) advise the Green Mountain Care Board on the design and
implementation of an ongoing evaluation process to continuously monitor
current performance in the health care delivery system; and
(6) provide coordinated and consensus recommendations to the General
Assembly on issues related to health care delivery, including primary care, and
population health.
(b)(1) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the following 18
members:
(A) the Secretary of Human Services or designee;
(B) the Chair of the Green Mountain Care Board or designee;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 24 of 43
2025
(C) the Chief Health Care Advocate from the Office of the Health
Care Advocate or designee;
(D) two members of the Vermont Steering Committee for
Comprehensive Primary Health Care, selected by the Steering Committee;
(E) one representative of commercial health insurers offering major
medical health insurance plans in Vermont, selected by the Commissioner of
Financial Regulation;
(F) two representatives of Vermont hospitals, selected by the
Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems, who shall represent
hospitals that are located in different regions of the State and that face different
levels of financial stability;
(G) one representative of Vermont’s federally qualified health
centers, selected by Bi-State Primary Care Association;
(H) one representative of physicians, selected by the Vermont
Medical Society;
(I) one representative of independent physician practices, selected by
HealthFirst;
(J) one representative of advanced practice registered nurses, selected
by the Vermont Nurse Practitioners Association;
(K) one representative of Vermont’s designated and specialized
service agencies, selected by Vermont Care Partners;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 25 of 43
2025
(L) one preferred provider from outside the designated and
specialized service agency system, selected by the Commissioner of Health;
(M) one Vermont-licensed mental health professional from an
independent practice, selected by the Commissioner of Mental Health;
(N) one representative of Vermont’s home health agencies, selected
jointly by the VNAs of Vermont and Bayada Home Health Care; and
(O) one representative of long-term care facilities, selected by the
Vermont Health Care Association; and
(P) one representative of small businesses, selected by the Vermont
Chamber of Commerce.
(2) The Advisory Committee shall consult with and solicit input from
the Health Equity Advisory Commission; physician assistants, physical
therapists, and other health care professionals who are not members of the
Advisory Committee; Vermont’s free clinic programs; the Vermont Program
for Quality in Health Care; and other relevant stakeholders.
(3) The Secretary of Human Services or designee shall be the Chair of
the Advisory Committee.
(4) The Agency of Human Services shall provide administrative and
technical assistance to the Advisory Committee.
(c) Members of the Advisory Committee shall not receive per diem
compensation or reimbursement of expenses for their participation on the
Advisory Committee.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 26 of 43
2025
Sec. 9a. 18 V.S.A. § 9403b is added to read:
§ 9403b. VERMONT STEERING COMMITTEE FOR COMPREHENSIVE
PRIMARY HEALTH CARE
(a) There is created the Vermont Steering Committee for Comprehensive
Primary Health Care to inform the work of State government, including the
Blueprint for Health and the Office of Health Care Reform in the Agency of
Human Services, as it relates to access to, delivery of, and payment for primary
care services in Vermont.
(b) The Steering Committee shall be composed of the following members:
(1) the Chair of the Department of Family Medicine at the University of
Vermont Larner College of Medicine or designee;
(2) the Chair of the Department of Pediatrics at the University of
Vermont Larner College of Medicine or designee;
(3) the Associate Dean for Primary Care at the University of Vermont
Larner College of Medicine or designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Vermont Child Health Improvement
Program at the University of Vermont Larner College of Medicine or designee;
(5) the President of the Vermont Academy of Family Physicians or
designee;
(6) the President of the American Academy of Pediatrics, Vermont
Chapter, or designee;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 27 of 43
2025
(7) a member of the Green Mountain Care Board’s Primary Care
Advisory Committee, selected by the Green Mountain Care Board;
(8) the Executive Director of the Blueprint for Health;
(9) a primary care clinician who practices at an independent practice,
selected by HealthFirst;
(10) a primary care clinician who practices at a federally qualified health
center, selected by Bi-State Primary Care Association;
(11) a primary care physician, selected by the Vermont Medical Society;
(12) a primary care physician assistant, selected by the Physician
Assistant Academy of Vermont;
(13) a primary care nurse practitioner, selected by the Vermont Nurse
Practitioners Association;
(14) a mental health provider who practices at a community mental
health center designated pursuant to section 8907 of this title, selected by
Vermont Care Partners;
(15) a licensed independent clinical social worker, selected by the
National Association of Social Workers, Vermont Chapter; and
(16) a psychologist, selected by the Vermont Psychological Association.
(c) The Steering Committee shall:
(1) engage in an ongoing assessment of comprehensive primary care
needs in Vermont;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 28 of 43
2025
(2) provide recommendations for recruiting and retaining high-quality
primary care providers, including on ways to encourage new talent to join
Vermont’s primary care workforce;
(3) develop proposals for sustainable payment models for primary care;
(4) identify methods for enhancing Vermonters’ access to primary care;
(5) recommend opportunities to reduce administrative burdens on
primary care providers;
(6) recommend mechanisms for measuring the quality of primary care
services delivered in Vermont;
(7) provide input regarding comprehensive primary health care for the
Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan as it is developed, updated, and
implemented pursuant to section 9403 of this title;
(8) consult with the Green Mountain Care Board in the event that the
Board develops reference-based pricing for primary care providers as
permitted under subdivision 9376(e)(5) of this title; and
(9) offer additional recommendations and guidance to the Blueprint for
Health, the Office of Health Care Reform, the General Assembly, and others in
State government on ways to increase access to primary care services and to
improve patient and provider satisfaction with primary care delivery in
Vermont.
(d) The Steering Committee shall receive administrative and technical
assistance from the Agency of Human Services.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 29 of 43
2025
(e)(1) The Executive Director of the Blueprint for Health shall call the first
meeting of the Steering Committee to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Steering Committee shall select a chair from among its members
at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership of the Steering Committee shall
constitute a quorum.
(f) Members of the Steering Committee shall not receive per diem
compensation or reimbursement of expenses for their participation on the
Steering Committee.
* * * Data Integration; Data Sharing * * *
Sec. 10. 18 V.S.A. § 9353 is added to read:
§ 9353. INTEGRATION OF HEALTH CARE DATA; REPORTS
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall collaborate with the Health
Information Exchange Steering Committee in the development of the Unified
Health Data Space in order to improve patient and provider access to relevant
information, increase efficiencies and decrease administrative burdens on
providers, and reduce health care system costs.
(b) The Agency’s development of the Unified Health Data Space shall:
(1) align with the statewide Health Information Technology Plan
established pursuant to section 9351 of this title;
(2) utilize the expertise of the Health Information Exchange Steering
Committee;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 30 of 43
2025
(3) incorporate appropriate privacy and security standards that are
aligned with the best privacy and security interests of patients;
(4) determine whether to integrate clinical data, claims data, data
regarding social drivers of health and health-related social needs, and other
data types and, if so, how to do so in a manner that protects proprietary
information relating to payers and providers; provided, however, that
integration of these data types or a subset of them shall not begin prior to
January 1, 2027 and shall occur only upon the favorable vote of a majority of
all voting members of the Health Information Exchange Steering Committee
and only for the specific uses approved by a majority of all voting members of
the Steering Committee;
(5) if data is integrated in accordance with subdivision (4) of this
subsection, limit the use of the integrated data to the specific uses approved by
the Health Information Exchange Steering Committee;
(6) ensure interoperability among contributing data sources and
applications to enable use of the Unified Health Data Space;
(7) identify the resources necessary to complete data linkages for policy,
health surveillance, population health management, and research usage and for
the data integration uses approved by the Health Information Exchange
Steering Committee pursuant to subdivisions (4) and (5) of this subsection;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 31 of 43
2025
(8) establish a timeline for setup and access to the integrated system;
(9) develop and implement a system that ensures rapid access for
patients and providers; and
(10) identify additional opportunities for future development, including
incorporating new data types and larger populations.
(c) The Agency shall provide access to data to State agencies and health
care providers as needed to support the goals of the Statewide Health Care
Delivery Strategic Plan established pursuant to section 9403 of this title, once
established, to the extent permitted by the data use agreements in place for
each data set and the uses approved pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this
section.
(d)(1) On or before January 15, 2026, the Agency of Human Services shall
report to the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and
the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding the advantages and
disadvantages of integrating clinical data, claims data, data regarding social
drivers of health and health-related social needs, and other data types in the
Unified Health Data Space; how an integrated system can improve patient and
provider access to relevant information, increase efficiencies and decrease
administrative burdens on providers, increase access to and quality of health
care for Vermonters, and reduce health care system costs; and how an
integrated system can be implemented in a manner that protects proprietary
information relating to payers and providers.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 32 of 43
2025
(2) On or before January 15 annually beginning in 2027, the Agency of
Human Services shall provide an update to the House Committees on Health
Care and on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare
regarding the development and implementation of the Unified Health Data
Space in accordance with this section.
Sec. 11. 18 V.S.A. § 9374 is amended to read:
§ 9374. BOARD MEMBERSHIP; AUTHORITY
* * *
(i)(1) In addition to any other penalties and in order to enforce the
provisions of this chapter and empower the Board to perform its duties, the
Chair of the Board may issue subpoenas, examine persons, administer oaths,
and require production of papers and records. Any subpoena or notice to
produce may be served by registered or certified mail or in person by an agent
of the Chair. Service by registered or certified mail shall be effective three
business days after mailing. Any subpoena or notice to produce shall provide
at least six business days’ time from service within which to comply, except
that the Chair may shorten the time for compliance for good cause shown.
Any subpoena or notice to produce sent by registered or certified mail, postage
prepaid, shall constitute service on the person to whom it is addressed.
(2) Each witness who appears before the Chair under subpoena shall
receive a fee and mileage as provided for witnesses in civil cases in Superior
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 33 of 43
2025
Courts; provided, however, any person subject to the Board’s authority shall
not be eligible to receive fees or mileage under this section.
(3) The Board may share any information, papers, or records it receives
pursuant to a subpoena or notice to produce issued under this section with the
Agency of Human Services or the Department of Financial Regulation, or
both, as appropriate to the work of the Agency or Department, provided that
the Agency or Department agrees to maintain the confidentiality of any
information, papers, or records that are exempt from public inspection and
copying under the Public Records Act.
* * *
* * * Health Care Reforms Addressing Exigent Needs * * *
Sec. 11a. HEALTH CARE SPENDING REDUCTIONS;
AGENCY OF HUMAN SERVICES; REPORTS
(a)(1) The Agency of Human Services shall facilitate collaboration and
coordination among health care providers in order to encourage cooperation in
developing rapid responses to the urgent financial pressures facing the health
care system and to identify opportunities to increase efficiency, improve the
quality of health care services, reduce spending on prescription drugs, and
increase access to essential services, including primary care, emergency
departments, mental health and substance use disorder treatment services,
prenatal care, and emergency medical services and transportation, while
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 34 of 43
2025
reducing hospital spending for hospital fiscal year 2026 by not less than 2.5
percent.
(2) The Agency of Human Services shall facilitate and supervise the
participation of hospitals and other health care providers in the process set
forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection as necessary for this collaborative
process to be afforded state-action immunity under applicable federal and State
antitrust laws.
(b) The Agency of Human Services shall report on the proposed reductions
that it has approved pursuant to this section, including applicable timing and
appropriate accountability measures, to the Health Reform Oversight
Committee and the Joint Fiscal Committee on or before July 1, 2025. On or
before the first day of each month of hospital fiscal year 2026, beginning on
October 1, 2025, the Agency shall provide updates to the Health Reform
Oversight Committee and the Joint Fiscal Committee when the General
Assembly is not in session, and to the House Committee on Health Care and
the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare when the General Assembly is in
session, regarding progress in implementing and achieving the hospital
spending reductions identified pursuant to this section.
Sec. 11b. HEALTH CARE SYSTEM TRANSFORMATION; AGENCY OF
HUMAN SERVICES; REPORTS
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall identify specific outcome
measures for determining whether, when, and to what extent each of the
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 35 of 43
2025
following goals of its health care system transformation efforts pursuant to
2022 Acts and Resolves No. 167 (Act 167) has been met:
(1) reduce inefficiencies;
(2) lower costs;
(3) improve health outcomes;
(4) reduce health inequities; and
(5) increase access to essential services.
(b)(1) The Agency of Human Services shall report to the Health Reform
Oversight Committee and the Joint Fiscal Committee:
(A) the specific outcome measures developed pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section, along with a timeline for accomplishing them;
(B) how the Agency will determine its progress in accomplishing the
outcome measures and achieving the transformation goals, including how it
will determine the amount of savings attributable to each inefficiency reduced
and how it will evaluate increases in access to essential services;
(C) the impact that each transformation decision made by an
individual hospital as part of the Act 167 transformation process has or will
have on the State’s health care system, including on health care costs and on
health insurance premiums;
(D) how the Agency is tracking and coordinating the transformation
efforts of individual hospitals to ensure that they complement the
transformation efforts of other hospitals and other health care providers and
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 36 of 43
2025
that they will contribute in a positive way to a transformed health care system
that meets the Act 167 goals; and
(E) the amount of State funds, and federal funds, if applicable, that
the Agency has spent on Act 167 transformation efforts to date or has obligated
for those purposes and the amount of unspent State funds appropriated for Act
167-related purposes that remain for the Agency’s Act 167 transformation
efforts.
(2) On or before the first day of each month beginning on August 1,
2025 through January 1, 2027, the Agency shall provide the Health Reform
Oversight Committee and the Joint Fiscal Committee when the General
Assembly is not in session, and to the House Committee on Health Care and
the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare when the General Assembly is in
session, with updates on each of the items set forth in subdivisions (1)(A)–(E)
of this subsection.
Sec. 11c. HEALTH CARE SYSTEM TRANSFORMATION; INCENTIVES;
TELEHEALTH
(a) To encourage hospitals to engage proactively, think expansively, and
propose transformation initiatives that will reduce costs to Vermont’s health
care system without negatively affecting health care quality or jeopardizing
access to necessary services, the Agency of Human Services shall award grants
to the hospitals in State fiscal year 2026 that actively participate in health care
transformation efforts to assist them in building partnerships, reducing hospital
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 37 of 43
2025
costs for hospital fiscal year 2026, and expanding Vermonters’ access to health
care services, including those delivered using telehealth. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that the funds appropriated in Sec. 18(b) of this act should
be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis until all of the funds have been
distributed.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Agency of Human Services shall
report to the Health Reform Oversight Committee and the Joint Fiscal
Committee regarding how much of the $2,000,000.00 appropriated to the
Agency pursuant to Sec. 18(b) of this act was obligated as of November 15,
2025 and how much had already been disbursed to hospitals as of that date.
Sec. 11d. DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL REGULATION;
DOMESTIC HEALTH INSURER SUSTAINABILITY;
REPORT
On or before November 1, 2025, the Department of Financial Regulation
shall provide to the Health Reform Oversight Committee a plan for preserving
the sustainability of domestic health insurers in Vermont, which may include
utilizing reinsurance.
* * * Retaining Accountable Care Organization Capabilities * * *
Sec. 12. RETAINING ACCOUNTABLE CARE ORGANIZATION
CAPABILITIES; REPORT
The Agency of Human Services shall explore opportunities to retain
capabilities developed by or on behalf of a certified accountable care
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 38 of 43
2025
organization that were funded in whole or in part using State or federal monies,
or both, and that have the potential to make beneficial contributions to
Vermont’s health care system, such as capabilities related to comprehensive
payment reform and quality data measurement and reporting. On or before
December 1, 2025, the Agency of Human Services shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Health Reform Oversight Committee.
* * * Implementation Updates * * *
Sec. 13. [Deleted.]
Sec. 14. GREEN MOUNTAIN CARE BOARD; IMPLEMENTATION;
REPORT
On or before February 15, 2026, the Green Mountain Care Board shall
provide an update to the House Committee on Health Care and the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare regarding the Board’s implementation of
this act, including the status of its efforts to establish methodologies for and
begin implementation of reference-based pricing and development of global
hospital budgets, and the effects of these efforts and activities on increasing
access to care, improving the quality of care, and reducing the cost of care in
Vermont.
Sec. 15. 3 V.S.A. § 3027 is amended to read:
§ 3027. HEALTH CARE SYSTEM REFORM; IMPROVING QUALITY
AND AFFORDABILITY; REPORT
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 39 of 43
2025
(a) The Director of Health Care Reform in the Agency of Human Services
shall be responsible for the coordination of health care system reform efforts
among Executive Branch agencies, departments, and offices, and for
coordinating with the Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A.
chapter 220.
(b) On or before February 15 annually, the Agency of Human Services
shall provide an update to the House Committee on Health Care and the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare regarding all of the following:
(1) The status of the Agency’s efforts to develop, update, and implement
the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan in accordance with 18
V.S.A. § 9403. The Agency shall adopt an evaluation framework using an
evidence-based approach to assess both the effectiveness of Plan development
and implementation and the Plan’s overall impact. The evaluation shall
include identifying what was accomplished, how well it was executed, and the
benefits to specific cohorts within Vermont’s health care system, and the
Agency shall include updated evaluation results annually as part of its report.
(2) The activities of the Health Care Delivery Advisory Committee
established pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9403a during the previous calendar year.
(3) The effects of the Statewide Health Care Delivery Strategic Plan, the
efforts and activities of the Health Care Delivery Advisory Committee, and
other efforts and activities engaged in or directed by the Agency on increasing
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 40 of 43
2025
access to care, improving the quality of care, and reducing the cost of care in
Vermont.
Sec. 16. 18 V.S.A. § 9375(d) is amended to read:
(d) Annually on or before January 15, the Board shall submit a report of its
activities for the preceding calendar year to the House Committee on Health
Care and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare.
(1) The report shall include:
* * *
(G) the status of its efforts to establish methodologies for and begin
implementation of reference-based pricing and development of global hospital
budgets, and the effects of these efforts and activities on increasing access to
care, improving the quality of care, and reducing the cost of care in Vermont;
(H) any recommendations for modifications to Vermont statutes; and
(H)(I) any actual or anticipated impacts on the work of the Board as a
result of modifications to federal laws, regulations, or programs.
* * *
* * * Positions; Appropriations * * *
Sec. 17. GREEN MOUNTAIN CARE BOARD; POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of the following three new permanent classified
positions is authorized at the Green Mountain Care Board in fiscal year 2026:
(1) one Director, Reference-Based Pricing;
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 41 of 43
2025
(2) one Project Manager, Reference-Based Pricing; and
(3) one Operations, Procurement, and Contractual Oversight Manager.
(b) These positions shall be transferred and converted from existing vacant
positions in the Executive Branch.
Sec. 18. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) The sum of $2,200,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 for use as follows:
(1) $2,000,000.00 for feasibility analysis and transformation plan
development with hospitals, designated agencies, primary care organizations,
and other community-based providers;
(2) $100,000.00 for development of quality and access measures,
targets, and monitoring strategies for the Statewide Health Care Delivery
Strategic Plan; and
(3) $100,000.00 to support the development of alternative payment
models.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 10301 to the contrary,
the sum of $2,000,000.00 is appropriated from the Health IT-Fund to the
Agency of Human Services in fiscal year 2026 for grants to hospitals for the
collaborative efforts to reduce hospital costs in accordance with Secs. 11a and
11c of this act and to expand access to health care services, such as by
enhancing telehealth infrastructure development.
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 42 of 43
2025
(c)(1) The sum of $1,062,500.00 is appropriated to the Green Mountain
Care Board in fiscal year 2026 for use as follows:
(A) $512,500.00 for the positions authorized in Sec. 17 of this act, as
set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection (c);
(B) $500,000.00 from the General Fund for contracts, including
contracts for assistance with implementing reference-based pricing in
accordance with this act; and
(C) $50,000.00 from the General Fund for a contract with the
Vermont Program for Quality in Health Care to engage in quality initiatives in
accordance with this act.
(2) Of the funds appropriated in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection:
(A) $205,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund; and
(B) $307,500.00 is appropriated from the Green Mountain Care
Board Regulatory and Administrative Fund.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 10301 to the contrary,
the sum of $150,000.00 is appropriated from the Health IT-Fund to the Green
Mountain Care Board in fiscal year 2026 for expenses associated with
increased standardization of electronic hospital budget data submissions in
accordance with Sec. 4 of this act.
(e) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide sufficient resources
in future fiscal years to enable the Green Mountain Care Board to fully
VT LEG #384284 v.1

No. 68 Page 43 of 43
2025
implement global hospital budgets in accordance with 18 V.S.A.
§ 9456(d)(1)(B).
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 19. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Sec. 16 (18 V.S.A. § 9375(d); Green Mountain Care Board annual
report) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
(b) Secs. 17 (Green Mountain Care Board; positions) and 18
(appropriations) shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(c) The remaining sections shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 12, 2025
VT LEG #384284 v.1